Maryland, session 2026, HB1284.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
19–4A–03.
(a) The Department shall adopt regulations that set standards for the care,
treatment, health, safety, welfare, and comfort of individuals who receive home health care
services through a residential service agency.
(b) The regulations shall provide for the licensing of residential service agencies.
(c) The regulations shall include provisions that:
(1) Provide for the establishment of residential service agencies;
(2) Establish qualifications for licensure;
– 1 –

Ch. 217 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) Set minimum standards for individuals who provide home health care
services through a residential service agency; [and]
(4) Require the residential service agency to screen and verify the
character references of all home health care providers that are employed by the residential
service agency; AND
(5) AUTHORIZE A RESIDENTIAL SERVICE AGENCY TO PROVIDE
TRAINING TO A LICENSED NURSE AFTER HIRE IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 19–4A–03.2
OF THIS SUBTITLE.
19–4A–03.2.
(A) A RESIDENTIAL SERVICE AGENCY THAT PROVIDES PRIVATE DUTY
NURSING SERVICES MAY EMPLOY A LICENSED NURSE WHO DOES NOT MEET THE
CLINICAL EXPERIENCE REQUIREMENTS ESTABLISHED BY THE DEPARTMENT IF THE
RESIDENTIAL SERVICE AGENCY PROVIDES TRAINING AND A COMPETENCY
EVALUATION IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION.
(B) A RESIDENTIAL SERVICE AGENCY THAT SEEKS TO EMPLOY A NURSE
DESCRIBED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION SHALL:
(1) ESTABLISH AND IMPLEMENT A TRAINING PROGRAM DESIGNED TO
ENSURE SAFE AND COMPETENT CARE BASED ON PATIENT NEEDS;
(2) ENSURE THE NURSE RECEIVES CLINICAL SUPERVISION BY A
REGISTERED NURSE QUALIFIED IN PRIVATE DUTY NURSING SERVICES;
(3) ASSIGN THE NURSE TO A QUALIFIED PRECEPTOR OR CLINICAL
SUPERVISOR UNTIL COMPETENCY IS DEMONSTRATED;
(4) DOCUMENT SATISFACTORY COMPLETION OF REQUIRED
COMPETENCY STANDARDS IN THE NURSE’S PERSONNEL FILE; AND
(5) CONDUCT COMPETENCY EVALUATIONS OF THE NURSE:
(I) ANNUALLY; OR
(II) FOR DISCIPLINARY PURPOSES, ON A MORE FREQUENT
SCHEDULE AS REQUIRED BY THE DEPARTMENT.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 217
(C) A TRAINING PROGRAM AND COMPETENCY EVALUATION REQUIRED
UNDER THIS SECTION ARE SUBJECT TO APPROVAL BY THE DEPARTMENT.
(D) THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO AFFECT REQUIREMENTS
RELATING TO OCCUPATIONAL LICENSURE, SCOPE OF PRACTICE, OR STANDARDS OF
CARE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 28, 2026.
– 3 –